test/src/gt-norm-yamls/noun-luojk_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - artium: # C_ILL_AJ_UNASS
    artium+N+Sg+Nom: artium
    artium+N+Sg+Gen: artiuma
    artium+N+Sg+Acc: artiumav
    artium+N+Sg+Ine: artiuman
    artium+N+Sg+Ill: artiumaj
    artium+N+Pl+Nom: artiuma
    artium+N+Pl+Ela: artiumajs
    artium+N+Pl+Com: artiumaj
    artium+N+Ess: artiuman
    artium+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: artiumasj
    artium+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: artiumatjasj
    artium+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    artium+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    artium+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Gen: []
    artium+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    artium+N+Abe: [artiumadak, artiumada]
 
  Noun - fokus: # C_ILL_IJ_UNASS
    fokus+N+Sg+Nom: fokus
    fokus+N+Sg+Gen: fokusa
    fokus+N+Sg+Acc: fokusav
    fokus+N+Sg+Ine: fokusin
    fokus+N+Sg+Ill: fokusij
    fokus+N+Pl+Nom: fokusa
    fokus+N+Pl+Ela: fokusijs
    fokus+N+Pl+Com: fokusij
    fokus+N+Ess: fokusin
    fokus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: fokusasj
    fokus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: fokusattjasj
    fokus+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    fokus+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: fokusahtes
    fokus+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Gen: [fokusahttása, fokusahttá]
    fokus+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    fokus+N+Abe: [fokusahtá, fokusahti]
    
  Noun - planetarijá: # NOADE
    planetarijá+N+Sg+Nom: planetarijá
    planetarijá+N+Sg+Gen: planetarijá
    planetarijá+N+Sg+Acc: planetarijáv
    planetarijá+N+Sg+Ine: planetariján
    planetarijá+N+Sg+Ill: planetarijáj
    planetarijá+N+Pl+Nom: planetarijá
    planetarijá+N+Pl+Ela: planetarijájs
    planetarijá+N+Pl+Com: planetarijáj
    planetarijá+N+Ess: planetariján
    planetarijá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: planetarijásj
    planetarijá+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: planetarijátjasj
    planetarijá+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: planetarijádibme
    planetarijá+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    planetarijá+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Gen: []
    planetarijá+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: planetarijálasj
    planetarijá+N+Abe: [planetarijádak, planetarijáda]
    
  Noun - kalendar: # SÅHKÅR
    kalendar+N+Sg+Nom: kalendar
    kalendar+N+Sg+Gen: [kalænndara, kalänndara]
    kalendar+N+Sg+Acc: [kalænndarav, kalänndarav]
    kalendar+N+Sg+Ine: [kalænndarin, kalänndarin]
    kalendar+N+Sg+Ill: [kalænndarij, kalänndarij]
    kalendar+N+Pl+Nom: [kalænndara, kalänndara]
    kalendar+N+Pl+Ela: [kalænndarijs, kalänndarijs]
    kalendar+N+Pl+Com: [kalænndarij, kalänndarij]
    kalendar+N+Ess: [kalænndarin, kalänndarin]
    kalendar+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [kalænndarasj, kalänndarasj]
    kalendar+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [kalænndarattjasj, kalänndarattjasj]
    kalendar+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: []
    kalendar+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [kalænndarahtes, kalänndarahtes]
    kalendar+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Gen: [kalænndarahttása, kalänndarahttása, kalænndarahttá, kalänndarahttá]
    kalendar+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    kalendar+N+Abe: [kalænndarahtá, kalänndarahtá, kalænndarahti, kalänndarahti]
    
  Noun - balloaŋŋa: # MUORRA_LOAN
    balloaŋŋa+N+Sg+Nom: balloaŋŋa
    balloaŋŋa+N+Sg+Gen: ballåŋŋa
    balloaŋŋa+N+Sg+Acc: ballåŋŋav
    balloaŋŋa+N+Sg+Ine: ballåŋŋan
    balloaŋŋa+N+Sg+Ill: balloaŋŋaj
    balloaŋŋa+N+Pl+Nom: ballåŋŋa
    balloaŋŋa+N+Pl+Ela: ballåŋŋajs
    balloaŋŋa+N+Pl+Com: ballåŋŋaj
    balloaŋŋa+N+Ess: balloaŋŋan
    balloaŋŋa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ballåŋŋasj
    balloaŋŋa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: ballåŋŋatjasj
    balloaŋŋa+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: ballåŋŋadibme
    balloaŋŋa+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    balloaŋŋa+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Gen: []
    balloaŋŋa+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: ballåŋŋalasj
    balloaŋŋa+N+Abe: [ballåŋŋadak, ballåŋŋada]
    
  Noun - fábel: # GAMAS
    fábal+N+Sg+Nom: fábal
    fábal+N+Sg+Acc: fáhpalav
    fábal+N+Sg+Com: fáhpalijn
    fábal+N+Ess: fáhpalin
    
  Noun - tærmos: # GAMAS
    tærmos+N+Sg+Nom: [tærmos, tärmos]
    tærmos+N+Sg+Acc: [tærmmusav, tärmmusav]
    tærmos+N+Sg+Com: [tærmmusijn, tärmmusijn]
    tærmos+N+Ess: [tærmmusin, tärmmusin, tærmon, tärmon]

  Noun - semestar: # GAMAS
    semestar+N+Sg+Nom: semestar
    semestar+N+Sg+Acc: [semæsstarav, semässtarav]
    semestar+N+Sg+Com: [semæsstarijn, semässtarijn]
    semestar+N+Ess: [semæsstarin, semässtarin]

  Noun - propellar: # GAMAS, SE only
    propælla+N+Sg+Nom: [propellar, propælla]
    propælla+N+Sg+Acc: [propällarav, propellav]
    propælla+N+Sg+Com: [propällarijn, propellajn]
    propælla+N+Ess:    [propällarin, propællan]
    
  Noun - tjijnoj: # ÅLMÅJ_LOAN
    tjijnoj+N+Sg+Nom: tjijnoj
    tjijnoj+N+Pl+Nom: [tjijnnu, tjijnnuha]
    tjijnoj+N+Sg+Ill: [tjijnnuj, tjijnnuhij]
    tjijnoj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [tjijnnusj, tjijnnuhasj]
    
  Noun - bistroj: # ÅLMÅJ_LOAN
    bistroj+N+Sg+Nom: bistroj
    bistroj+N+Sg+Gen: [bisstru, bisstruha]
    bistroj+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [bisstruma, bisstruhimme]
    bistroj+N+Sg+Acc: [bisstruv, bisstruhav]
    bistroj+N+Sg+Ine: [bisstrun, bisstruhin]
    bistroj+N+Sg+Ill: [bisstruj, bisstruhij]
    bistroj+N+Sg+Ela: [bisstrus, bisstruhis]
    bistroj+N+Sg+Com: [bisstrujn, bisstruhijn]
    bistroj+N+Pl+Nom: [bisstru, bisstruha]
    bistroj+N+Pl+Gen: [bisstruj, bisstruhij]
    bistroj+N+Pl+Acc: [bisstrujt, bisstruhijt]
    bistroj+N+Pl+Ine: [bisstrujn, bisstruhijn]
    bistroj+N+Pl+Ill: [bisstrujda, bisstruhijda]
    bistroj+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: [bisstrujdiseda, bisstruhijdasihtte]
    bistroj+N+Pl+Ela: [bisstrujs, bisstruhijs]
    bistroj+N+Pl+Com: [bisstruj, bisstruhij]
    bistroj+N+Ess: [bisstrun, bistron, bisstruhin]
    bistroj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [bisstrusj, bisstruhasj]
    bistroj+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [bisstrutjasj, bisstruhattjasj]
    bistroj+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: bisstrudibme
    bistroj+N+Abe: [bisstrudak, bisstruda, bisstruhahti, bisstruhahtá]
    
  Noun - universitiehtta: # ALFABET
    universitiehtta+N+Sg+Nom: [universitähtta, universitiehtta]
    universitiehtta+N+Sg+Ine: [universitehtan, universitiehtan]
    universitiehtta+N+Sg+Ill: [universitähttaj, universitiehttaj]
    universitiehtta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [universitehtasj, universitiehtasj]
    universitiehtta+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [universitehtatjasj, universitiehtatjasj]
    universitiehtta+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: [universitehtadibme, universitiehtadibme]
    universitiehtta+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: []
    universitiehtta+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: [universitehtalasj, universitiehtalasj]
    universitiehtta+N+Abe: [universitehtadak, universitehtada, universitiehtadak, universitiehtada] # the abessive -da is listed in Grundstöm, not in Spiik or Giellaj Hilá
    universitiehtta+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: [universitähttasimme, universitiehttasimme]
